Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3310
Licensed veterinarian, defined.

Licensed veterinarian means a person who is validly and currently licensed to practice veterinary medicine and surgery in this state.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1092.